Illinois, session 104th, SB1945.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 521B-20 and 21B-30 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/21B-20)7    Sec. 21B-20. Types of licenses. The State Board of 8Education shall implement a system of educator licensure, 9whereby individuals employed in school districts who are 10required to be licensed must have one of the following 11licenses: (i) a professional educator license; (ii) an 12educator license with stipulations; (iii) a substitute 13teaching license; or (iv) until June 30, 2028, a short-term 14substitute teaching license. References in law regarding 15individuals certified or certificated or required to be 16certified or certificated under Article 21 of this Code shall 17also include individuals licensed or required to be licensed 18under this Article. The first year of all licenses ends on June 1930 following one full year of the license being issued.20    The State Board of Education, in consultation with the 21State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, may adopt such 22rules as may be necessary to govern the requirements for 23licenses and endorsements under this Section.   SB1945- 2 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1        (1) Professional Educator License. Persons who (i) 2    have successfully completed an approved educator 3    preparation program and are recommended for licensure by 4    the Illinois institution offering the educator preparation 5    program, (ii) have successfully completed the required 6    testing under Section 21B-30 of this Code, (iii) have 7    successfully completed coursework on the psychology of, 8    the identification of, and the methods of instruction for 9    the exceptional child, including, without limitation, 10    children with learning disabilities, (iv) have 11    successfully completed coursework in methods of reading 12    and reading in the content area, and (v) have met all other 13    criteria established by rule of the State Board of 14    Education shall be issued a Professional Educator License. 15    All Professional Educator Licenses are valid until June 30 16    immediately following 5 years of the license being issued. 17    The Professional Educator License shall be endorsed with 18    specific areas and grade levels in which the individual is 19    eligible to practice. For an early childhood education 20    endorsement, an individual may satisfy the student 21    teaching requirement of his or her early childhood teacher 22    preparation program through placement in a setting with 23    children from birth through grade 2, and the individual 24    may be paid and receive credit while student teaching. The 25    student teaching experience must meet the requirements of 26    and be approved by the individual's early childhood   SB1945- 3 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1    teacher preparation program.2        Individuals can receive subsequent endorsements on the 3    Professional Educator License. Subsequent endorsements 4    shall require a minimum of 24 semester hours of coursework 5    in the endorsement area and passage of the applicable 6    content area test, unless otherwise specified by rule.7        (2) Educator License with Stipulations. An Educator 8    License with Stipulations shall be issued an endorsement 9    that limits the license holder to one particular position 10    or does not require completion of an approved educator 11    program or both.12        An individual with an Educator License with 13    Stipulations must not be employed by a school district or 14    any other entity to replace any presently employed teacher 15    who otherwise would not be replaced for any reason.16        An Educator License with Stipulations may be issued 17    with the following endorsements:18            (A) (Blank). 19            (B) Alternative provisional educator. An 20        alternative provisional educator endorsement on an 21        Educator License with Stipulations may be issued to an 22        applicant who, at the time of applying for the 23        endorsement, has done all of the following:24                (i) Graduated from a regionally accredited 25            college or university with a minimum of a 26            bachelor's degree.  SB1945- 4 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1                (ii) Successfully completed the first phase of 2            the Alternative Educator Licensure Program for 3            Teachers, as described in Section 21B-50 of this 4            Code.5                (iii) Passed a content area test, as required 6            under Section 21B-30 of this Code.7        The alternative provisional educator endorsement is 8    valid for 2 years of teaching and may be renewed for a 9    third year by an individual meeting the requirements set 10    forth in Section 21B-50 of this Code. 11            (C) Alternative provisional superintendent. An 12        alternative provisional superintendent endorsement on 13        an Educator License with Stipulations entitles the 14        holder to serve only as a superintendent or assistant 15        superintendent in a school district's central office. 16        This endorsement may only be issued to an applicant 17        who, at the time of applying for the endorsement, has 18        done all of the following:19                (i) Graduated from a regionally accredited 20            college or university with a minimum of a master's 21            degree in a management field other than education.22                (ii) Been employed for a period of at least 5 23            years in a management level position in a field 24            other than education.25                (iii) Successfully completed the first phase 26            of an alternative route to superintendent   SB1945- 5 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1            endorsement program, as provided in Section 21B-55 2            of this Code.3                (iv) Passed a content area test required under 4            Section 21B-30 of this Code.5            The endorsement is valid for 2 fiscal years in 6        order to complete one full year of serving as a 7        superintendent or assistant superintendent.8            (D) (Blank).9            (E) Career and technical educator. A career and 10        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 11        with Stipulations may be issued to an applicant who 12        has a minimum of 60 semester hours of coursework from a 13        regionally accredited institution of higher education 14        or an accredited trade and technical institution and 15        has a minimum of 2,000 hours of experience outside of 16        education in each area to be taught.17            The career and technical educator endorsement on 18        an Educator License with Stipulations is valid until 19        June 30 immediately following 5 years of the 20        endorsement being issued and may be renewed.21            An individual who holds a valid career and 22        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 23        with Stipulations but does not hold a bachelor's 24        degree may substitute teach in career and technical 25        education classrooms. 26            An individual who holds a valid career and   SB1945- 6 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 2        with Stipulations is entitled to all of the rights and 3        privileges granted to a holder of a Professional 4        Educator License. 5            (F) (Blank).6            (G) Transitional bilingual educator. A 7        transitional bilingual educator endorsement on an 8        Educator License with Stipulations may be issued for 9        the purpose of providing instruction in accordance 10        with Article 14C of this Code to an applicant who 11        provides satisfactory evidence that he or she meets 12        all of the following requirements:13                (i) Possesses adequate speaking, reading, and 14            writing ability in the language other than English 15            in which transitional bilingual education is 16            offered.17                (ii) Has the ability to successfully 18            communicate in English.19                (iii) Either possessed, within 5 years 20            previous to his or her applying for a transitional 21            bilingual educator endorsement, a valid and 22            comparable teaching certificate or comparable 23            authorization issued by a foreign country or holds 24            a degree from an institution of higher learning in 25            a foreign country that the State Educator 26            Preparation and Licensure Board determines to be   SB1945- 7 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1            the equivalent of a bachelor's degree from a 2            regionally accredited institution of higher 3            learning in the United States.4            A transitional bilingual educator endorsement 5        shall be valid for prekindergarten through grade 12, 6        is valid until June 30 immediately following 5 years 7        of the endorsement being issued, and shall not be 8        renewed.9            Persons holding a transitional bilingual educator 10        endorsement shall not be employed to replace any 11        presently employed teacher who otherwise would not be 12        replaced for any reason. 13            (H) Language endorsement. In an effort to 14        alleviate the shortage of teachers speaking a language 15        other than English in the public schools, an 16        individual who holds an Educator License with 17        Stipulations may also apply for a language 18        endorsement, provided that the applicant provides 19        satisfactory evidence that he or she meets all of the 20        following requirements:21                (i) Holds a transitional bilingual 22            endorsement. 23                (ii) Has demonstrated proficiency in the 24            language for which the endorsement is to be issued 25            by passing the applicable language content test 26            required by the State Board of Education.  SB1945- 8 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1                (iii) Holds a bachelor's degree or higher from 2            a regionally accredited institution of higher 3            education or, for individuals educated in a 4            country other than the United States, holds a 5            degree from an institution of higher learning in a 6            foreign country that the State Educator 7            Preparation and Licensure Board determines to be 8            the equivalent of a bachelor's degree from a 9            regionally accredited institution of higher 10            learning in the United States.11                (iv) (Blank).12            A language endorsement on an Educator License with 13        Stipulations is valid for prekindergarten through 14        grade 12 for the same validity period as the 15        individual's transitional bilingual educator 16        endorsement on the Educator License with Stipulations 17        and shall not be renewed.18            (I) Visiting international educator. A visiting 19        international educator endorsement on an Educator 20        License with Stipulations may be issued to an 21        individual who is being recruited by a particular 22        school district that conducts formal recruitment 23        programs outside of the United States to secure the 24        services of qualified teachers and who meets all of 25        the following requirements:26                (i) Holds the equivalent of a minimum of a   SB1945- 9 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1            bachelor's degree issued in the United States.2                (ii) Has been prepared as a teacher at the 3            grade level for which he or she will be employed.4                (iii) Has adequate content knowledge in the 5            subject to be taught.6                (iv) Has an adequate command of the English 7            language.8            A holder of a visiting international educator 9        endorsement on an Educator License with Stipulations 10        shall be permitted to teach in bilingual education 11        programs in the language that was the medium of 12        instruction in his or her teacher preparation program, 13        provided that he or she passes the English Language 14        Proficiency Examination or another test of writing 15        skills in English identified by the State Board of 16        Education, in consultation with the State Educator 17        Preparation and Licensure Board.18            A visiting international educator endorsement on 19        an Educator License with Stipulations is valid for 5 20        years and shall not be renewed.21            (J) Paraprofessional educator. A paraprofessional 22        educator endorsement on an Educator License with 23        Stipulations may be issued to an applicant who holds a 24        high school diploma or its recognized equivalent and 25        (i) holds an associate's degree or a minimum of 60 26        semester hours of credit from a regionally accredited   SB1945- 10 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1        institution of higher education; (ii) has passed a 2        paraprofessional competency test under subsection 3        (c-5) of Section 21B-30; or (iii) is at least 18 years 4        of age and will be using the Educator License with 5        Stipulations exclusively for grades prekindergarten 6        through grade 8, until the individual reaches the age 7        of 19 years and otherwise meets the criteria for a 8        paraprofessional educator endorsement pursuant to this 9        subparagraph (J). The paraprofessional educator 10        endorsement is valid until June 30 immediately 11        following 5 years of the endorsement being issued and 12        may be renewed through application and payment of the 13        appropriate fee, as required under Section 21B-40 of 14        this Code. An individual who holds only a 15        paraprofessional educator endorsement is not subject 16        to additional requirements in order to renew the 17        endorsement.18            (K) Chief school business official. A chief school 19        business official endorsement on an Educator License 20        with Stipulations may be issued to an applicant who 21        qualifies by having a master's degree or higher, 2 22        years of full-time administrative experience in school 23        business management or 2 years of university-approved 24        practical experience, and a minimum of 24 semester 25        hours of graduate credit in a program approved by the 26        State Board of Education for the preparation of school   SB1945- 11 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1        business administrators and by passage of the 2        applicable State tests, including an applicable 3        content area test. 4            The chief school business official endorsement may 5        also be affixed to the Educator License with 6        Stipulations of any holder who qualifies by having a 7        master's degree in business administration, finance, 8        accounting, or public administration and who completes 9        an additional 6 semester hours of internship in school 10        business management from a regionally accredited 11        institution of higher education and passes the 12        applicable State tests, including an applicable 13        content area test. This endorsement shall be required 14        for any individual employed as a chief school business 15        official. 16            The chief school business official endorsement on 17        an Educator License with Stipulations is valid until 18        June 30 immediately following 5 years of the 19        endorsement being issued and may be renewed if the 20        license holder completes renewal requirements as 21        required for individuals who hold a Professional 22        Educator License endorsed for chief school business 23        official under Section 21B-45 of this Code and such 24        rules as may be adopted by the State Board of 25        Education. 26            The State Board of Education shall adopt any rules   SB1945- 12 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1        necessary to implement Public Act 100-288.2            (L) Provisional in-state educator. A provisional 3        in-state educator endorsement on an Educator License 4        with Stipulations may be issued to a candidate who has 5        completed an Illinois-approved educator preparation 6        program at an Illinois institution of higher education 7        and who has not successfully completed an 8        evidence-based assessment of teacher effectiveness but 9        who meets all of the following requirements: 10                (i) Holds at least a bachelor's degree.11                (ii) Has completed an approved educator 12            preparation program at an Illinois institution.13                (iii) Has passed an applicable content area 14            test, as required by Section 21B-30 of this Code.15                (iv) Has attempted an evidence-based 16            assessment of teacher effectiveness and received a 17            minimum score on that assessment, as established 18            by the State Board of Education in consultation 19            with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure 20            Board.21            A provisional in-state educator endorsement on an 22        Educator License with Stipulations is valid for one 23        full fiscal year after the date of issuance and may not 24        be renewed.25            (L-5) Provisional in-state educator. If an 26        assessment is determined to be non-uniform according   SB1945- 13 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1        to subsection (i-5) of Section 21B-30, a provisional 2        in-state educator endorsement on an Educator License 3        with Stipulations may be issued to a candidate who has 4        completed an Illinois-approved educator preparation 5        program at an Illinois institution of higher education 6        and who has not successfully completed an applicable 7        content area test but who meets all of the following 8        requirements: 9                (i) Holds at least a bachelor's degree.10                (ii) Has completed an approved educator 11            preparation program at an Illinois institution.12                (iii) Has passed an evidence-based assessment 13            of teacher effectiveness, as required by Section 14            21B-30. If an evidence-based assessment of teacher 15            effectiveness is not required by Section 21B-30 at 16            the time a candidate applies for this provisional 17            in-state educator endorsement on an Educator 18            License with Stipulations, candidates shall not be 19            eligible under this subsection.20                (iv) Has attempted an applicable content area 21            test that has been determined to be non-uniform 22            per subsection (i-5) of Section 21B-30 and has not 23            attempted any uniform content area tests.24        A provisional in-state educator endorsement on an 25    Educator License with Stipulations is valid for one full 26    fiscal year after the date of issuance and may not be   SB1945- 14 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1    renewed. 2            (M) (Blank).3            (N) Specialized services. A specialized services 4        endorsement on an Educator License with Stipulations 5        may be issued as defined and specified by rule. 6            (O) Provisional career and technical educator. A 7        provisional career and technical educator endorsement 8        on an Educator License with Stipulations may be issued 9        to an applicant who has a minimum of 8,000 hours of 10        work experience in the skill for which the applicant 11        is seeking the endorsement. Each employing school 12        board and regional office of education shall provide 13        verification, in writing, to the State Superintendent 14        of Education at the time the application is submitted 15        that no qualified teacher holding a Professional 16        Educator License or an Educator License with 17        Stipulations with a career and technical educator 18        endorsement is available to teach and that actual 19        circumstances require such issuance.20            A provisional career and technical educator 21        endorsement on an Educator License with Stipulations 22        is valid until June 30 immediately following 5 years 23        of the endorsement being issued and may be renewed.24            An individual who holds a provisional career and 25        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 26        with Stipulations may teach as a substitute teacher in   SB1945- 15 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1        career and technical education classrooms. 2            An individual who holds a provisional career and 3        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 4        with Stipulations is entitled to all of the rights and 5        privileges granted to a holder of a Professional 6        Educator License. 7        (3) Substitute Teaching License. A Substitute Teaching 8    License may be issued to qualified applicants for 9    substitute teaching in all grades of the public schools, 10    prekindergarten through grade 12. Substitute Teaching 11    Licenses are not eligible for endorsements. Applicants for 12    a Substitute Teaching License must hold a bachelor's 13    degree or higher from a regionally accredited institution 14    of higher education or must be enrolled in an approved 15    educator preparation program in this State and have earned 16    at least 90 credit hours.17        Substitute Teaching Licenses are valid for 5 years.18        Substitute Teaching Licenses are valid for substitute 19    teaching in every county of this State. If an individual 20    has had his or her Professional Educator License or 21    Educator License with Stipulations suspended or revoked, 22    then that individual is not eligible to obtain a 23    Substitute Teaching License.24        A substitute teacher may only teach in the place of a 25    licensed teacher who is under contract with the employing 26    board. If, however, there is no licensed teacher under   SB1945- 16 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1    contract because of an emergency situation, then a 2    district may employ a substitute teacher for no longer 3    than 30 calendar days per each vacant position in the 4    district if the district notifies the appropriate regional 5    office of education within 5 business days after the 6    employment of the substitute teacher in that vacant 7    position. A district may continue to employ that same 8    substitute teacher in that same vacant position for 90 9    calendar days or until the end of the semester, whichever 10    is greater, if, prior to the expiration of the 11    30-calendar-day period then current, the district files a 12    written request with the appropriate regional office of 13    education for a 30-calendar-day extension on the basis 14    that the position remains vacant and the district 15    continues to actively seek qualified candidates and 16    provides documentation that it has provided training 17    specific to the position, including training on meeting 18    the needs of students with disabilities and English 19    learners if applicable. Each extension request shall be 20    granted in writing by the regional office of education. An 21    emergency situation is one in which an unforeseen vacancy 22    has occurred and (i) a teacher is unexpectedly unable to 23    fulfill his or her contractual duties or (ii) teacher 24    capacity needs of the district exceed previous indications 25    or vacancies are unfilled due to a lack of qualified 26    candidates, and the district is actively engaged in   SB1945- 17 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1    advertising to hire a fully licensed teacher for the 2    vacant position.3        There is no limit on the number of days that a 4    substitute teacher may teach in a single school district, 5    provided that no substitute teacher may teach for longer 6    than 120 days beginning with the 2021-2022 school year 7    through the 2022-2023 school year, otherwise 90 school 8    days for any one licensed teacher under contract in the 9    same school year. A substitute teacher who holds a 10    Professional Educator License or Educator License with 11    Stipulations shall not teach for more than 120 school days 12    for any one licensed teacher under contract in the same 13    school year. The limitations in this paragraph (3) on the 14    number of days a substitute teacher may be employed do not 15    apply to any school district operating under Article 34 of 16    this Code.17        A school district may not require an individual who 18    holds a valid Professional Educator License or Educator 19    License with Stipulations to seek or hold a Substitute 20    Teaching License to teach as a substitute teacher. 21        (4) Short-Term Substitute Teaching License. Beginning 22    on July 1, 2018 and until June 30, 2028, applicants may 23    apply to the State Board of Education for issuance of a 24    Short-Term Substitute Teaching License. A Short-Term 25    Substitute Teaching License may be issued to a qualified 26    applicant for substitute teaching in all grades of the   SB1945- 18 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1    public schools, prekindergarten through grade 12. 2    Short-Term Substitute Teaching Licenses are not eligible 3    for endorsements. Applicants for a Short-Term Substitute 4    Teaching License must hold an associate's degree or have 5    completed at least 60 credit hours from a regionally 6    accredited institution of higher education.7        Short-Term Substitute Teaching Licenses are valid for 8    substitute teaching in every county of this State. If an 9    individual has had his or her Professional Educator 10    License or Educator License with Stipulations suspended or 11    revoked, then that individual is not eligible to obtain a 12    Short-Term Substitute Teaching License.13        The provisions of Sections 10-21.9 and 34-18.5 of this 14    Code apply to short-term substitute teachers. 15        An individual holding a Short-Term Substitute Teaching 16    License may teach no more than 15 consecutive days per 17    licensed teacher who is under contract. For teacher 18    absences lasting 6 or more days per licensed teacher who 19    is under contract, a school district may not hire an 20    individual holding a Short-Term Substitute Teaching 21    License, unless the Governor has declared a disaster due 22    to a public health emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the 23    Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act. An individual 24    holding a Short-Term Substitute Teaching License must 25    complete the training program under Section 10-20.67 or 26    34-18.60 of this Code to be eligible to teach at a public   SB1945- 19 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1    school. Short-Term Substitute Teaching Licenses under this 2    Section are valid for 5 years. 3(Source: P.A. 102-711, eff. 1-1-23; 102-712, eff. 4-27-22; 4102-713, eff. 1-1-23; 102-717, eff. 4-29-22; 102-894, eff. 55-20-22; 103-111, eff. 6-29-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 6103-193, eff. 1-1-24; 103-564, eff. 11-17-23; 103-617, eff. 77-1-24.) 8    (105 ILCS 5/21B-30)9    Sec. 21B-30. Educator testing.10    (a) (Blank).11    (b) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the 12State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, shall design 13and implement a system of examinations, which shall be 14required prior to the issuance of educator licenses. These 15examinations and indicators must be based on national and 16State professional teaching standards, as determined by the 17State Board of Education, in consultation with the State 18Educator Preparation and Licensure Board. The State Board of 19Education may adopt such rules as may be necessary to 20implement and administer this Section.21    (c) (Blank).22    (c-5) The State Board must adopt rules to implement a 23paraprofessional competency test. This test would allow an 24applicant seeking an Educator License with Stipulations with a 25paraprofessional educator endorsement to obtain the   SB1945- 20 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1endorsement if he or she passes the test and meets the other 2requirements of subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of Section 321B-20 other than the higher education requirements. 4    (d) All applicants seeking a State license shall be 5required to pass a test of content area knowledge for each area 6of endorsement for which there is an applicable test. There 7shall be no exception to this requirement.8    (d-5) The State Board shall consult with any applicable 9vendors within 90 days after July 28, 2023 (the effective date 10of Public Act 103-402) to develop a plan to transition the test 11of content area knowledge in the endorsement area of 12elementary education, grades one through 6, by July 1, 2026 to 13a content area test that contains testing elements that cover 14bilingualism, biliteracy, oral language development, 15foundational literacy skills, and developmentally appropriate 16higher-order comprehension and on which a valid and reliable 17language and literacy subscore can be determined. The State 18Board shall base its rules concerning the passing subscore on 19the language and literacy portion of the test on the 20recommended cut-score determined in the formal 21standard-setting process. Candidates need not achieve a 22particular subscore in the area of language and literacy. The 23State Board shall aggregate and publish the number of 24candidates in each preparation program who take the test and 25the number who pass the language and literacy portion.26    (e) (Blank).  SB1945- 21 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1    (f) Beginning on August 4, 2023 (the effective date of 2Public Act 103-488) through August 31, 2025, no candidate 3completing a teacher preparation program in this State or 4candidate subject to Section 21B-35 of this Code is required 5to pass a teacher performance assessment. Except as otherwise 6provided in this Article, beginning on September 1, 2015 until 7August 4, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 103-488) and 8beginning again on September 1, 2025, all candidates 9completing teacher preparation programs in this State and all 10candidates subject to Section 21B-35 of this Code are required 11to pass a teacher performance assessment approved by the State 12Board of Education, in consultation with the State Educator 13Preparation and Licensure Board. A candidate may not be 14required to submit test materials by video submission. Subject 15to appropriation, an individual who holds a Professional 16Educator License and is employed for a minimum of one school 17year by a school district designated as Tier 1 under Section 1818-8.15 may, after application to the State Board, receive 19from the State Board a refund for any costs associated with 20completing the teacher performance assessment under this 21subsection. 22    (f-5) The Teacher Performance Assessment Task Force is 23created to evaluate potential performance-based and objective 24teacher performance assessment systems for implementation 25across all educator preparation programs in this State, with 26the intention of ensuring consistency across programs and   SB1945- 22 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1supporting a thoughtful and well-rounded licensure system. 2Members appointed to the Task Force must reflect the racial, 3ethnic, and geographic diversity of this State. The Task Force 4shall consist of all of the following members:5        (1) One member of the Senate, appointed by the 6    President of the Senate.7        (2) One member of the Senate, appointed by the 8    Minority Leader of the Senate.9        (3) One member of the House of Representatives, 10    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.11        (4) One member of the House of Representatives, 12    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 13    Representatives.14        (5) One member who represents a statewide professional 15    teachers' organization, appointed by the State 16    Superintendent of Education.17        (6) One member who represents a different statewide 18    professional teachers' organization, appointed by the 19    State Superintendent of Education.20        (7) One member from a statewide organization 21    representing school principals, appointed by the State 22    Superintendent of Education.23        (8) One member from a statewide organization 24    representing regional superintendents of schools, 25    appointed by the State Superintendent of Education.26        (9) One member from a statewide organization   SB1945- 23 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1    representing school administrators, appointed by the State 2    Superintendent of Education.3        (10) One member representing a school district 4    organized under Article 34 of this Code, appointed by the 5    State Superintendent of Education.6        (11) One member of an association representing rural 7    and small schools, appointed by the State Superintendent 8    of Education.9        (12) One member representing a suburban school 10    district, appointed by the State Superintendent of 11    Education.12        (13) One member from a statewide organization 13    representing school districts in the southern suburbs of 14    the City of Chicago, appointed by the State Superintendent 15    of Education.16        (14) One member from a statewide organization 17    representing large unit school districts, appointed by the 18    State Superintendent of Education.19        (15) One member from a statewide organization 20    representing school districts in the collar counties of 21    the City of Chicago, appointed by the State Superintendent 22    of Education.23        (16) Three members, each representing a different 24    public university in this State and each a current member 25    of the faculty of an approved educator preparation 26    program, appointed by the State Superintendent of   SB1945- 24 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1    Education.2        (17) Three members, each representing a different 3    4-year nonpublic university or college in this State and 4    each a current member of the faculty of an approved 5    educator preparation program, appointed by the State 6    Superintendent of Education.7        (18) One member of the Board of Higher Education, 8    appointed by the State Superintendent of Education.9        (19) One member representing a statewide policy 10    organization advocating on behalf of multilingual students 11    and families, appointed by the State Superintendent of 12    Education.13        (20) One member representing a statewide organization 14    focused on research-based education policy to support a 15    school system that prepares all students for college, a 16    career, and democratic citizenship, appointed by the State 17    Superintendent of Education.18        (21) Two members representing an early childhood 19    advocacy organization, appointed by the State 20    Superintendent of Education.21        (22) One member representing a statewide organization 22    that partners with educator preparation programs and 23    school districts to support the growth and development of 24    preservice teachers, appointed by the State Superintendent 25    of Education. 26        (23) One member representing a statewide organization   SB1945- 25 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1    that advocates for educational equity and racial justice 2    in schools, appointed by the State Superintendent of 3    Education.4        (24) One member representing a statewide organization 5    that represents school boards, appointed by the State 6    Superintendent of Education.7        (25) One member who has, within the last 5 years, 8    served as a cooperating teacher, appointed by the State 9    Superintendent of Education. 10    Members of the Task Force shall serve without 11compensation. The Task Force shall first meet at the call of 12the State Superintendent of Education, and each subsequent 13meeting shall be called by the chairperson of the Task Force, 14who shall be designated by the State Superintendent of 15Education. The State Board of Education shall provide 16administrative and other support to the Task Force.17    On or before October 31, 2024, the Task Force shall report 18on its work, including recommendations on a teacher 19performance assessment system in this State, to the State 20Board of Education and the General Assembly. The Task Force is 21dissolved upon submission of this report. 22    (g) The content area knowledge test and the teacher 23performance assessment shall be the tests that from time to 24time are designated by the State Board of Education, in 25consultation with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure 26Board, and may be tests prepared by an educational testing   SB1945- 26 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1organization or tests designed by the State Board of 2Education, in consultation with the State Educator Preparation 3and Licensure Board. The test of content area knowledge shall 4assess content knowledge in a specific subject field. The 5tests must be designed to be racially neutral to ensure that no 6person taking the tests is discriminated against on the basis 7of race, color, national origin, or other factors unrelated to 8the person's ability to perform as a licensed employee. The 9score required to pass the tests shall be fixed by the State 10Board of Education, in consultation with the State Educator 11Preparation and Licensure Board. The State Board of 12Education's rules for scoring the content area knowledge test 13may include scoring and retaking of each test section 14separately and independently. The tests shall be administered 15not fewer than 3 times a year at such time and place as may be 16designated by the State Board of Education, in consultation 17with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board. 18    The State Board shall implement a test or tests to assess 19the speaking, reading, writing, and grammar skills of 20applicants for an endorsement or a license issued under 21subdivision (G) of paragraph (2) of Section 21B-20 of this 22Code in the English language and in the language of the 23transitional bilingual education program requested by the 24applicant. 25    (g-5) The process by which the State Board of Education, 26or any entity designated by the State Board of Education,   SB1945- 27 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1evaluates content area tests to determine content validity, 2absence of bias, or scores required to pass shall be public 3information and shall be made available on the website of the 4State Board of Education, including, but not limited to:5        (1) details related to the process by which members 6    are selected to form a committee or group to make such 7    determinations;8        (2) the names, titles, and organizational affiliations 9    of the members of any such group;10        (3) the agendas and minutes of each meeting of any 11    such group, except that the complete text of individual 12    test questions shall not be public information if they 13    remain in the bank of questions to be used in active 14    content area tests; however, minutes of the discussion of 15    the content of those individual questions shall be public 16    to the maximum extent practicable that does not provide 17    candidates an advantage in correctly answering those 18    questions; and19        (4) any determinations, recommendations, or decisions 20    made by any such group regarding tests or individual test 21    items. 22    (h) Except as provided in Section 34-6 of this Code, the 23provisions of this Section shall apply equally in any school 24district subject to Article 34 of this Code.25    (i) The rules developed to implement and enforce the 26testing requirements under this Section shall include, without   SB1945- 28 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1limitation, provisions governing test selection, test 2validation, and determination of a passing score, 3administration of the tests, frequency of administration, 4applicant fees, frequency of applicants taking the tests, the 5years for which a score is valid, and appropriate special 6accommodations. The State Board of Education shall develop 7such rules as may be needed to ensure uniformity from year to 8year in the level of difficulty for each form of an assessment.9    (i-5) The State Board shall evaluate each content area 10test after it has been administered for at least 10 months, but 11not more than 12 months, and shall determine that a content 12test is non-uniform if, in the first fiscal year in which it is 13available:14        (1) the overall percentage of candidates passing that 15    form of the content area test is 10 or more percentage 16    points lower than the percentage of candidates who passed 17    the most recent uniform content area test required by the 18    State Board for the same license or endorsement in either 19    of the 2 preceding fiscal years, or;20        (2) the percentage of candidates, in any demographic 21    subgroup comprising at least 10 total test attempts, 22    passing that form of the content area test is 15 or more 23    percentage points lower than the percentage of candidates 24    in that demographic subgroup who passed the previous form 25    of that content area test in either of the two preceding 26    fiscal years for which that demographic subgroup comprised   SB1945- 29 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1    at least 10 total test attempts.2    An assessment first introduced prior to January 1, 2017 3shall be considered uniform, and an assessment introduced on 4or after January 1, 2017 that does not meet the criteria in 5paragraph (1) or (2) shall be considered uniform.6    If a content test is determined to be non-uniform as 7described in this Section, the State Board of Education shall:8        (i) Convene, or require any applicable vendors to 9    convene, one or more committees to review the content, 10    bias, and passing score requirements of that content test 11    and recommend changes to improve uniformity, subject to 12    the transparency guidelines in subsection (g-5).13        (ii) Offer, or require any applicable vendors to 14    offer, the most recent uniform content area test required 15    by the State Board for the same license or endorsement as 16    an option until the new assessment is determined to be 17    uniform.18        (iii) Provide, or require any applicable vendors to 19    provide, an opportunity to attempt the most recent uniform 20    content area test required by the State Board for the same 21    license or endorsement to candidates who attempted but did 22    not pass the most recent version of the content area test, 23    at no cost to these candidates.24        (iv) Implement a process by which candidates who 25    attempted but did not pass the content test may apply for 26    provisional licensure as described in paragraph (M) of   SB1945- 30 -LRB104 10967 LNS 21049 b1    subsection (2) of Section 21B-20.2    (i-10) If the State Board finds that the content area test 3forms available as of January 1, 2025 are not uniform in the 4level of difficulty as compared to previous forms of those 5exams, any candidate for licensure who attempted any content 6area test in the form that was available as of January 1, 2025, 7and whose best scores in each subsection of the same content 8area exam, taken across multiple attempts on the same form of 9the exam, equal or exceed the passing score for that content 10area exam as of January 1, 2025, shall be determined to have 11passed that content area exam.12    This subsection is inoperative when each of the content 13area test forms available as of January 1, 2025 has been 14replaced by a new and uniform version of that content area 15test. 16(Source: P.A. 102-301, eff. 8-26-21; 103-402, eff. 7-28-23; 17103-488, eff. 8-4-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-780, eff. 188-2-24; 103-811, eff. 8-9-24; 103-846, eff. 8-9-24.)